Connecticut, session 2026, HB05133.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 That section 12-700 of the general statutes be amended to increase the
2 highest marginal rate of the personal income tax from six and ninety-
LCO No. 937 1 of 2

Proposed Bill No. 5133
3 nine-hundredths per cent to seven and ninety-nine-hundredths per
4 cent.